Tennessee statutes. Title 66 Property
Part 2

Federal Tax Liens

66-21-201. Recording of notices of liens—Fees.

Notices of liens for taxes or other obligations payable to the United States, and certificates discharging and notices affecting such liens, including certificates of redemption relating to the liens, shall be recorded in the office of the register of deeds of the county within which the property subject to such lien is situated.

There shall be no fees collected by the county register at the time the notice of the lien or certificate discharging the lien is recorded, but the register shall extend credit to the United States for such recording fees as are chargeable, and submit the bill at the end of each month to the district director of the internal revenue service or other appropriate federal official in order to obtain payment. Notices of federal liens and any certificates of discharge or certificates of redemption, after proper indexing, shall be recorded in a separate book of federal liens or in any combined system of recording.

Acts 1927, ch. 56, § 1; Code 1932, § 8029; Acts 1975, ch. 52, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-2110; Acts 1987, ch. 161, § 1; 1991, ch. 60, §§ 1, 2.

Cross-References. State and local tax liens, §§67-5-2101 —67-5-2103.

Law Reviews.

Taxation — Priority of Federal Tax Lien, 32 Tenn. L. Rev. 666 (1965).

66-21-202. Lien index, lien books, and filing of notices.

When notice of the lien is filed, the register shall forthwith enter the same in an alphabetical federal lien index, or the lien book, showing on one (1) line the name and residence of the lien debtor named in such notice, the serial number of such notice, the date and hour of filing, and the amount of tax or other obligation with interest, penalties and costs.

Acts 1927, ch. 56, § 2; mod. Code 1932, § 8030; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-2111; Acts 1987, ch. 161, § 2; 1991, ch. 60, § 3.

66-21-203. Book furnished for notices.

The federal lien index, or lien book in lieu, and file or files for the federal lien notices shall be furnished to the county register in the manner now provided by law for the furnishing of books in which deeds are recorded.

Acts 1927, ch. 56, § 4; mod. Code 1932, § 8032; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-2112; Acts 1987, ch. 161, § 3.

66-21-204. Discharge of lien or certificate of redemption.

When a certificate of discharge of any lien or certificate of redemption issued by the director of the internal revenue service or other proper officer is recorded in the office of the register where the original notice of lien is recorded, the register shall enter the same with the date of filing in the proper index.

Acts 1927, ch. 56, § 3; Code 1932, § 8031; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-2113; Acts 1987, ch. 161, § 4; 1991, ch. 60, § 4.

66-21-205. Applicability of part.

This part applies to federal tax liens and to all other federal lien notices, including certificates of redemption, which, under any act of congress or any regulation adopted pursuant thereto, are required or permitted to be recorded in the same manner as notices of federal tax liens or in the one (1) office designated within the state for the recording of federal liens, and to designate the one (1) office within this state for these purposes.

Acts 1927, ch. 56, § 5; mod. Code 1932, § 8033; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-2114; Acts 1987, ch. 161, § 5; 1991, ch. 60, § 5.

66-21-206. Uniformity of construction.

This part shall be so interpreted and construed as to effectuate its general purpose to make uniform the law of those states which enact it.

Acts 1927, ch. 56, § 6; Code 1932, § 8034; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-2115.

66-21-121. Entry of release of lien — Fee.